Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1007
Board; meetings; rules and regulations; adopt; vacancies.

The board shall be the governing body of the district and shall meet annually on the same day the annual meeting of participating members of the district is held pursuant to section 46-1016, and such annual meeting of the board of directors shall follow the annual meeting of participating members, and at such other times as may be determined by the board or upon call by the chairman or any two members of the board. Vacancies on the board shall be filled for the unexpired term, and until a successor is elected and has qualified, by appointment by the remaining members of the board. The board shall adopt such rules and regulations in conformity with the provisions of sections 46-1001 to 46-1020 and the bylaws of the district as are deemed necessary for the conduct of the business of the district. It shall be the duty of the secretary to cause an entry to be made upon its records showing all of its minutes, decisions and orders made pursuant to the provisions of sections 46-1001 to 46-1020.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 7, p. 750.